Arkansas, session 2025, HB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-4-205 is amended to read as follows:
11-4-205. Right of collective bargaining not affected.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing
Nothing in this subchapter, including the provisions of § 11-4-218(b), shall
be deemed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of
employers and employees to bargain collectively through representatives of
their own choosing in order to establish wages or other conditions of work.
(b) Collective bargaining by public employees is prohibited under §
21-1-801 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 1, Subchapter 8, is
repealed.
Subchapter 8 - Collective Bargaining

21-1-801. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
*LGL013*
01-16-2025 14:46:42 LGL013

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1024
(1)(A) “Public employee” means a person who performs a full-time
or part-time service for wages, salary, or other remuneration for a public
employer.
(B) “Public employee” includes without limitation a state
employee under § 21-1-610.
(C) “Public employee” does not include a:
(i) Public safety officer, including without
limitation a:
(a) Law enforcement officer; and
(b) Firefighter; and
(ii) Public transit system employee whose public
employer is a recipient of a federal grant administered by the Federal
Transit Administration;
(2) “Public employer” means:
(A) An agency, department, board, commission, division,
office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the state,
including the offices of the various Arkansas elected constitutional officers
and the General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus, and divisions;
(B) A state-supported college, university, technical
college, community college, or other institution of higher education or a
department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education;
(C) The Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the
Administrative Office of the Courts, the circuit courts, and prosecuting
attorneys' offices; and
(D) A public school district, school, or an office or
department of a public school district in Arkansas; and
(3) “Strike” means a refusal to work organized by two (2) or
more public employees as a form of protest in an attempt to gain a concession
or concessions from a public employer.

21-1-802. Collective bargaining prohibited.
(a) A public employer shall not recognize a labor union or other
public employee association as a bargaining agent of public employees.
(b) A public employer shall not collectively bargain or enter into any
collective bargaining contract with a labor union or other public employee
association or its agents with respect to any matter relating to public
01-16-2025 14:46:42 LGL013

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1024
employees, public employees' employment with a public employer, or public
employees' tenure with a public employer.

21-1-803. Prohibited activities.
(a) A public employee willfully refuses to perform the duties of his
or her employment with a public employer when, acting in concert with one (1)
or more public employees, he or she:
(1) Strikes or walks away from the duties of his or her
employment with the public employer;
(2) Physically obstructs the activity or operation of the public
employer; or
(3) Physically impedes the operations of a public employer.
(b) A public employee who violates subsection (a) of this section
shall be terminated by the public employer.
(c) A public employee terminated under subsection (b) of this section
is ineligible for employment with a public employer in any position or
capacity for twelve (12) months after being terminated for willfully refusing
to perform the duties of his or her employment with a public employer.
(d) A public employer shall include in the public employer's personnel
manual a statement that willfully refusing to perform the duties of his or
her employment with a public employer constitutes grounds for dismissal.

21-1-804. Public employee associations.
Public employees may form associations for the purpose of promoting the
public employees' interests before a public employer.

/s/A. Collins









01-16-2025 14:46:42 LGL013